Louisiana, session 2026, HB188.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:981.1(C) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§981.1. Court reporter shortage
* * *
C.(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 37:2556(A)(1), a court may
utilize a digital transcription platform for the purposes of preserving the court record
in all court proceedings.
(2) A court reporter certified in any method may transcribe court records
virtually using any court-approved cloud-based digital recording system.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, when a cloud-based recording
system is in use, a court reporter is not required to be physically present during the
proceedings in order to certify the transcript of the proceedings.
(3) A court reporter utilizing a digital recording platform may remotely
operate recording equipment in any trial court, provided that the court reporter is a
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-819 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 188
certified digital reporter. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, court
personnel may operate and monitor the digital recording system. Court personnel
operating the equipment are not required to be digitally certified but shall be trained
in best practices for digital recording controls and equipment monitoring.